Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.060

Washington state mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory committee—Established—Composition.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1234.SL) ***

The Washington state mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory committee is established.

(1) The committee shall be comprised of nine members. Two members shall be licensed mental health counselors. Two members shall be licensed marriage and family therapists. One member shall be a licensed independent clinical social worker, and one member shall be a licensed advanced social worker. Three members must be consumers and represent the public at large and may not be licensed mental health care providers.

(2) Three members shall be appointed for a term of one year, three members shall be appointed for a term of two years, and three members shall be appointed for a term of three years. Subsequent members shall be appointed for terms of three years. A person must not serve as a member for more than two consecutive terms.

(3)(a) Each member must be a resident of the state of Washington.

(b) Each member must not hold an office in a professional association for mental health, social work, or marriage and family therapy and must not be employed by the state of Washington.

(c) Each professional member must have been actively engaged as a mental health counselor, marriage and family therapist, or social worker for five years immediately preceding appointment.

(d) The consumer members must represent the general public and be unaffiliated directly or indirectly with the professions licensed under this chapter.

(4) The secretary shall appoint the committee members.

(5) Committee members are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal, based on the department's disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good faith.

(6) Committee members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, including travel expenses in carrying out his or her authorized duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7) The committee shall elect a chair and vice chair.

[2001 c 251 s 6.]